Adoption of China-Hosted AI by International Enterprises: A 2024-2025 Analysis
I. Executive Summary
This report investigates the adoption by enterprises outside of China of AI models and capabilities from leading Chinese AI providers, specifically when accessed via China-hosted or China-originated cloud infrastructure, including direct API access to China-hosted services, for the period 2024-2025. This analysis distinguishes such cloud-based access from the self-hosting of downloaded open-source models from the same Chinese providers.
Key Adoption Trends: The direct, officially sanctioned adoption of AI services hosted within mainland China by non-Chinese enterprises for their global operations (outside of China) appears limited and highly niche during 2024-2025. The primary mode through which international entities are engaging with Chinese AI innovations is via the download and self-hosting of the numerous high-quality open-source models released by Chinese firms. Another pathway involves leveraging the international data centers of major Chinese cloud providers for regional operations, which is distinct from utilizing mainland China-hosted infrastructure for global, non-China activities. Direct API access to models explicitly hosted in China, such as some offerings from DeepSeek, represents a specific category of adoption. However, this route faces substantial headwinds for mainstream enterprise use outside China, primarily due to significant concerns regarding data governance, security, and geopolitical factors.1
Primary Chinese AI Providers and Models: Several Chinese AI providers have gained international prominence. DeepSeek, with its competitively priced and high-performing models accessible via China-hosted APIs, has seen interest, particularly from individual developers and potentially through "shadow IT" within enterprises.1 Major Chinese cloud players like Alibaba Cloud, Tencent Cloud, and Huawei Cloud offer extensive AI capabilities; however, their international enterprise clients typically utilize services from global or regional data centers rather than mainland China infrastructure for operations outside China.7 Other model developers such as Zhipu AI, Moonshot AI, MiniMax, and 01.AI are also making their models available, often with a strong open-source component, alongside API offerings whose hosting locations for international users require careful scrutiny.10
Core Drivers and Significant Barriers: The primary drivers for considering China-hosted AI services are significant cost-effectiveness compared to Western alternatives and, in some cases, unique or competitive model performance.1 However, these are largely overshadowed by substantial barriers. These include concerns about data security and privacy, compliance with international data protection regulations (e.g., GDPR, CCPA), the implications of Chinese data laws permitting government access to data, geopolitical tensions, potential censorship embedded in models, and intellectual property risks.1
Distinction Between China-Hosted Access and Self-Hosted Open-Source Models: A critical distinction lies in data control and regulatory exposure. Self-hosting open-source models from Chinese providers allows international enterprises to leverage Chinese AI innovations while maintaining control over their data and hosting environment, thereby mitigating many risks associated with China-hosted infrastructure. This pathway is emerging as the more prevalent and strategically sound adoption route for risk-averse international organizations seeking to utilize Chinese AI capabilities.
Strategic Implications: The ascent of high-performing, often lower-cost, AI models from China introduces new competitive dynamics in the global AI market. Non-Chinese enterprises face a complex decision matrix, needing to meticulously weigh the performance and cost advantages against the considerable data governance, regulatory, and geopolitical risks associated with direct reliance on China-hosted AI services. The robust open-source movement originating from China offers a significant alternative pathway for accessing these technological advancements, albeit requiring in-house MLOps capabilities. The overall landscape suggests a cautious and limited engagement with China-hosted AI services by international firms for their non-China operations, with a stronger inclination towards leveraging Chinese open-source AI on their own terms and infrastructure.
II. The Landscape of Chinese AI Providers and Cloud-Accessible Offerings (2024-2025)
The period 2024-2025 has witnessed a remarkable surge in the capabilities and global visibility of Chinese AI providers. These entities range from established cloud service giants integrating AI into their platforms to a new wave of agile AI model developers rapidly pushing the frontiers of performance and efficiency. Understanding their offerings and international strategies is crucial for assessing adoption by non-Chinese enterprises.
A. Overview of Leading Chinese AI Companies and their Global Posture
Chinese AI development is characterized by a synergistic relationship between government initiatives, academic research, and a vibrant private sector.20 Companies like Alibaba, Tencent, Huawei, and Baidu, already major technology players, have heavily invested in AI as a core component of their cloud services and broader digital ecosystems. Concurrently, specialized AI firms such as DeepSeek, Zhipu AI, Moonshot AI, MiniMax, 01.AI, Shengshu Technology, and Infinigence AI have emerged, often with strong ties to academic institutions like Tsinghua University and the Chinese Academy of Sciences, and are making significant impacts, particularly through open-source contributions and high-performance models.20 Their global posture varies: some are actively targeting international markets with localized services and global infrastructure, while others gain international traction primarily through the global accessibility of their open-source models or uniquely performing APIs.
B. Cloud Service Providers and their AI Platforms
Major Chinese cloud providers have established significant global infrastructure. Their AI offerings for international clients are generally delivered through these international data centers rather than routing data back to mainland China, to address latency, data sovereignty, and regulatory concerns.
Alibaba Cloud:
Offerings: Alibaba Cloud's AI capabilities are prominently showcased through its Qwen family of models (including Qwen base models, QwQ for reasoning, Qwen-VL for vision-language, Qwen2.5-1M for long context, and Wan2.1 for video generation).25 These are accessible via ModelScope, described as China's largest open-source AI model community, and the Platform for AI (PAI).7 The PAI-Model Gallery provides access to nearly 300 open-source models with no-code deployment options.7
Infrastructure: Alibaba Cloud operates a substantial global network, reporting 87 availability zones across 29 regions worldwide.7
International Strategy: The company is actively pursuing international customers, unveiling new AI models, tools, and infrastructure upgrades specifically for this market segment in 2025.7 A "GenAI Empowerment Program" was launched to support global developers and startups utilizing Qwen models.31
Data Hosting for International Clients: While specific case studies like LVMH (a French company) detail the use of Alibaba Cloud's AI tools to enhance customer engagement within the Chinese market 32, this is distinct from using China-hosted AI for operations outside China. For international clients operating outside China, services are typically provisioned from Alibaba Cloud's international data centers to comply with data residency and performance requirements.
Tencent Cloud:
Offerings: Tencent's AI portfolio includes the Hunyuan series of AI models, with capabilities in image, video, and 3D generation.33 The company also promotes Tencent Cloud Super App as a Service (TCSAS) for building integrated digital ecosystems.8 A range of AI and Machine Learning services, such as Image Creation Large Models and Video Creation Large Models, are available.35
Infrastructure: Tencent Cloud possesses a global infrastructure with 56 availability zones across 21 regions, including data centers in mainland China and international locations such as Jakarta, Frankfurt, Tokyo, Sao Paulo, and Osaka.39
International Strategy: Tencent Cloud is marketing solutions like TCSAS to international clients, with examples including Telkomsel in Indonesia and Bank Rakyat Indonesia.8 Their "China Connect" solutions appear primarily designed to facilitate international companies' operations within China or to improve connectivity to China, rather than for non-Chinese entities to use China-hosted AI for their global operations outside of China.35
Data Hosting for International Clients: For international clients like Telkomsel and Bank Rakyat Indonesia, AI services are likely hosted in Tencent's regional data centers (e.g., Jakarta or Singapore) to meet local data regulations and performance needs.8
Huawei Cloud:
Offerings: The Pangu series of models forms the core of Huawei's AI offerings, covering Natural Language Processing (NLP), Vision, Multimodal capabilities, Prediction, and Scientific Computing.43 Huawei Cloud also provides an AI Data Lake solution and makes foundation models accessible via its AI Cloud Service, leveraging its computing centers.9
Infrastructure: Huawei Cloud's global infrastructure is referred to as KooVerse 46, with an expanding presence in regions like Asia Pacific.47
International Strategy: A significant part of Huawei Cloud's international strategy revolves around its "Go-Global" solutions, which are primarily aimed at assisting Chinese enterprises in their international expansion efforts.32 While Huawei Cloud reports serving over 140 carriers and 500 financial institutions globally with substantial growth outside mainland China 9, the focus of detailed case studies (e.g., Kingsoft Office, MINISO) is often on Chinese companies leveraging Huawei's global cloud and AI for their international operations.32 Partnerships with international companies like du in the Middle East are typically for regional service deployment.45
Data Hosting for International Clients: Non-Chinese enterprises using Huawei Cloud AI services for their non-China operations would likely be served from Huawei's international data centers. There is no clear evidence in the provided materials of non-Chinese companies opting for China-hosted Pangu models for their global operations outside China.
Baidu AI Cloud (Qianfan platform):
Offerings: Baidu's flagship AI offerings are the ERNIE models, including ERNIE 4.5 Turbo and Ernie X1 Turbo, accessible via its Qianfan platform.48 Baidu provides AI services to a large number of domestic enterprises.51
Infrastructure: Baidu's cloud operations are primarily conducted through its mainland China subsidiaries and Variable Interest Entities (VIEs).54 The company recently launched a 30,000-card AI training cluster in China.49
International Strategy: While Baidu's autonomous driving solution, Apollo Go, operates within China 55, specific strategies to attract non-Chinese enterprises to use China-hosted ERNIE APIs for their non-China operations are not prominently detailed. The company announced support for DeepSeek models on its cloud platform, but this is within the domestic Chinese context.56
Data Hosting for International Clients: Given Baidu's operational structure, direct use of Baidu AI Cloud by international firms for their non-China operations would most likely involve China-hosted infrastructure. However, specific evidence of such adoption by non-Chinese enterprises for their external global operations is limited in the available information.
C. Direct API Providers (Primarily Model Developers)
A significant trend is the rise of specialized AI model developers offering direct API access. The hosting location for these APIs is a critical factor for international adoption.
DeepSeek:
Offerings: Known for its DeepSeek-V3 (LLM), DeepSeek-R1 (reasoning LLM), and Janus-Pro-7B (vision model).57 API access is a primary mode of delivery.1
Infrastructure/Hosting: DeepSeek's official applications and developer API are explicitly stated to be hosted in China, with all user data stored on servers within China.2
International Strategy: DeepSeek has garnered substantial international attention due to its models' high performance and cost-efficiency.1 The DeepSeek iOS application was reportedly the most downloaded free app in the U.S. at one point, indicating broad initial interest.6 The platform supports login via email and Google for international users.63
Zhipu AI (BigModel.ai / Z.ai):
Offerings: Developer of the GLM (General Language Model) series, including GLM-4 and the GLM-Z1 inference and "rumination" models.10 Services are offered via its MaaS platform (bigmodel.cn) and a dedicated international domain, Z.ai.10
Infrastructure/Hosting: The Z.ai platform is described as "international-facing".10 However, the terms of service for the BigModel Open Platform (bigmodel.cn) reference the laws of the People's Republic of China 67, implying a China-based operational nexus for at least part of its service infrastructure. The precise data hosting locations for international users accessing Z.ai's MaaS offerings for non-China operations require further clarification beyond the provided materials.
International Strategy: The launch of Z.ai signals clear global ambitions.10 Zhipu AI is also actively open-sourcing its models under permissive licenses like MIT to foster global accessibility and community engagement.10
Moonshot AI (Kimi):
Offerings: Known for its Kimi chatbot (Kimi 1.5) capable of long-context processing, and the open-source Kimi-VL (vision-language) model.11 The Kimi Open Platform provides API access.11
Infrastructure/Hosting: Moonshot AI is based in Beijing, China.11 While its Kimi Open Platform privacy policy discusses data collection and international transfers with safeguards 73, it does not explicitly detail whether all international enterprise API traffic is solely processed and stored in China. BytePlus (ByteDance's enterprise arm) also offers Kimi Chat, stating compliance with international data protection regulations, but without specifying hosting locations for non-Chinese enterprise clients.75
International Strategy: Kimi has gained international user interest, and Moonshot AI was reported to be planning entry into the U.S. market.11 Kimi 1.5 was offered free globally, attracting a wide user base.70
MiniMax:
Offerings: Provides MiniMax-Text-01 (LLM), MiniMax-VL-01 (vision-language model), Hailuo AI (for video and music generation), and the Talkie chatbot application.24 An API platform is available for developers.76
Infrastructure/Hosting: MiniMax is a Shanghai-based company.24 Notably, its MiniMax-MCP (Model Context Protocol) server documentation distinguishes between "Global" (api.minimaxi.chat) and "Mainland" (api.minimax.chat) API hosts.12 This suggests a potential infrastructure separation, with the "Global" endpoint possibly hosted outside mainland China to serve international clients.
International Strategy: The Talkie application achieved significant traction in the U.S. market.24 The provision of distinct global API endpoints indicates a strategy to cater to international users with potentially different data hosting preferences or requirements.
01.AI (YiLingWanWu):
Offerings: Developer of the Yi series of models, including Yi-1.5, Yi-9B-200K (long context), Yi-VL (vision-language), and Yi-Coder (for code generation).13 Also offers the Wanzhi productivity assistant.13
Infrastructure/Hosting: 01.AI is a Beijing-based company. While its models are extensively open-sourced, details regarding the specific hosting locations (China-hosted vs. global AZs) for its API services when used by international clients are not explicitly provided in the available information.
International Strategy: Yi models are made available to developers worldwide 13 and have demonstrated strong performance on global benchmarks, indicating an ambition for international recognition and adoption.84
ByteDance (Seed AI / Doubao):
Offerings: The Doubao (Seed) team is responsible for foundation models, including Seed1.5-VL (vision-language), Seed-Coder (code LLM), the DeerFlow research framework, and UI-TARS-1.5 (multimodal agent).85 BytePlus, ByteDance's enterprise technology arm, offers ModelArk, which supports models like DeepSeek and SkyLark.75
Infrastructure/Hosting: ByteDance operates AI labs across China, Singapore, and the U.S..86 Significantly, ByteDance is reportedly planning to spend $7 billion in 2025 to secure Nvidia chips through facilities located outside of China.89 This indicates a strategic move to diversify AI infrastructure beyond mainland China, likely to support its international operations (including TikTok) and address data sovereignty concerns for global users.
International Strategy: Products like Doubao app, Coze, and Jimeng are applications powered by their models.86 BytePlus is the primary vehicle for targeting international enterprise markets. The open-source release of models like UI-TARS-1.5 on platforms like Hugging Face also facilitates global developer engagement.88
Shengshu Technology:
Offerings: Specializes in video generation with its Vidu model series (including Vidu Q1 and Vidu 2.0).24 An API platform is available for Vidu.24
Infrastructure/Hosting: Shengshu Technology is based in Beijing.91 Access to Vidu is provided via its website (vidu.com / vidu.studio).92 Specific details differentiating China-hosted versus international data center hosting for API access by non-Chinese clients are not available in the snippets.
International Strategy: The company announced a global launch of the Vidu website.91 Vidu 2.0 was marketed as the industry's fastest and most affordable video generation solution, targeting a global audience.93
Infinigence AI:
Offerings: Primarily focuses on developing AI infrastructure and computing clusters designed to reduce the cost of deploying AI models.24 Its open-source contributions include projects like Infini-Megrez, Semi-PD (for LLM serving), and SpecEE (for LLM inference acceleration), as well as the LVEval benchmark.97
Infrastructure/Hosting: Infinigence AI is based in Shanghai.95 While it provides infrastructure solutions, and has offered API access to models like Qwen-72b-instruct for specific events 99, its primary model is not direct AI model API provision to end-users in the same vein as other listed companies.
International Strategy: The company aims to make AI deployment as accessible as utilities by optimizing hardware-software synergy.24 Its open-source projects suggest engagement with the global developer community focused on AI infrastructure.
D. Academic and Research Institutions (and their spin-offs/associated companies)
These institutions play a vital role in China's AI ecosystem, often being the source of foundational research and talent for commercial AI ventures. Their direct offerings to international enterprises via China-hosted infrastructure are typically limited, with influence more commonly spread through open-source projects, publications, and collaborations.
Tsinghua University: Heavily linked with prominent AI startups like Zhipu AI, Baichuan AI, Moonshot AI, and MiniMax.20 Its THUNLP Lab collaborated on the open-source AgentCPM-GUI 100, and its Institute for AI Industry Research (AIR) is active in AI research and dialogues.101
Peking University: The PKU-YuanGroup's Open-Sora-Plan is a notable open-source initiative aiming to reproduce Sora's video generation capabilities.102 The Berggruen Research Center focuses on AI philosophy and ethics 103, and the PKU-Baichuan-MLSystemLab works on Data-Centric ML and LLM systems.105
Shanghai AI Laboratory (SHLAB): A state-affiliated research institution fostering collaboration between academia and industry.20 Its OpenMMLab platform for computer vision has global users.20 The lab is involved in AI safety research and policy, and hosts various open-source projects via its open-sciencelab GitHub (e.g., AI for science, LLM fine-tuning).20 It also has an Autonomous Driving Lab (ADLab) 108 and offers funding for AI research projects.109
Institute of Automation, Chinese Academy of Sciences (CASIA): Unveiled the ScienceOne AI-driven research platform, featuring tools like S1-Literature and S1-ToolChain, aimed at automating scientific research.110 The open-source status of ScienceOne components is not explicitly clear from the snippets.110 CASIA's direct GitHub presence shows limited recent open-source activity on its main organizational page 111, but it contributes to broader AI initiatives.20
The following table provides a comparative overview of these key Chinese AI providers and their primary access models relevant to international users.
Table 1: Overview of Key Chinese AI Providers and Primary Access Models for International Users (2024-2025)

AI Provider
Key AI Models/Services
Primary China-Hosted API Access (Yes/No/Potentially)
Notable Open-Source Models for Self-Hosting
Availability on International Cloud Marketplaces (Non-Chinese Clouds)
Stated International Data Center Strategy (if any)
Alibaba Cloud
Qwen family (LLM, VLM, Reasoning, Video), PAI platform, ModelScope
Potentially (for users opting into mainland regions, but international clients typically use global AZs)
Qwen family (extensive, Apache 2.0 & other licenses) 25
Yes (ModelScope models on Hugging Face; specific marketplace integrations not detailed)
Extensive global AZ network (29 regions, 87 AZs) 7
Tencent Cloud
Hunyuan models (Image, Video, 3D), TCSAS, AI/ML PaaS
Potentially (for users opting into mainland regions, but international clients typically use global AZs)
Hunyuan models (some are open-sourced, e.g., HY Video on Hugging Face) 33
Yes (Hugging Face for some models)
Global AZ network (21 regions, 56 AZs), including specific intl. locations like Jakarta, Frankfurt, Osaka 40
Huawei Cloud
Pangu models (NLP, Vision, Multimodal etc.), AI Data Lake, AI Cloud Service
Potentially (Pangu models accessible via AI Cloud Service, but international clients likely use global AZs)
MindSpore framework (Apache 2.0) 112; Pangu models largely proprietary 43
Not explicitly detailed for Pangu models on non-Huawei marketplaces.
KooVerse global infrastructure; focus on Asia Pacific expansion 46
Baidu AI Cloud
ERNIE models (LLM), Qianfan platform
Yes (primary infrastructure is China-based) 54
ERNIE 4.5 planned for open source 51; PaddlePaddle framework (Apache 2.0) 113
Yes (PaddlePaddle models on Hugging Face)
Primarily China-focused infrastructure for AI Cloud 49
DeepSeek
DeepSeek-V3 (LLM), DeepSeek-R1 (Reasoning), Janus-Pro-7B (Vision)
Yes (explicitly China-hosted API and data storage) 2
DeepSeek-V3, R1 (MIT license) 58
Yes (models on Hugging Face) 59
API is China-hosted 2
Zhipu AI (Z.ai)
GLM series (LLM, Reasoning, Rumination), CogView4 (Image)
Potentially (Z.ai international platform, but MaaS terms link to PRC law) 10
GLM series, CogView4 (MIT license) 10
Yes (models on Hugging Face) 64
Launch of "international-facing" Z.ai platform 10
Moonshot AI (Kimi)
Kimi chatbot (LLM), Kimi-VL (VLM)
Potentially (China-based company, Kimi Open Platform API) 11
Kimi-VL, Muon optimizer 11
Yes (models/components on Hugging Face) 68
Reported plans for US market entry; BytePlus offers Kimi Chat internationally 11
MiniMax
MiniMax-Text-01 (LLM), MiniMax-VL-01 (VLM), Hailuo AI (Video/Music), Speech-02 (TTS)
Potentially (offers distinct "Global" API endpoint, may be non-China hosted) 12
MiniMax-01 series (MIT license), Audio-Tools repo 77
Yes (models on Hugging Face, GitHub) 76
Separate "Global" and "Mainland" API hosts 12
01.AI (Yi)
Yi series (LLM, Code, VLM), Wanzhi (Assistant)
Potentially (China-based company offering APIs)
Yi series (extensive, Apache 2.0) 84
Yes (models on Hugging Face, GitHub) 84
Global availability of open-source models 13
ByteDance (Seed AI)
Doubao models, Seed1.5-VL, Seed-Coder, UI-TARS-1.5 (Agent)
Potentially (via BytePlus for international enterprise)
Seed1.5-VL, Seed-Coder, DeerFlow, UI-TARS-1.5 (various OS licenses) 86
Yes (models on Hugging Face, GitHub) 86
Planned $7bn spend on Nvidia chips via non-China facilities for 2025 89; Labs in China, US, Singapore 86
Shengshu Technology
Vidu (Text-to-Video)
Potentially (API platform for Vidu) 24
U-ViT architecture papers, but Vidu model itself not explicitly stated as open-source in snippets 90
Not explicitly detailed for Vidu model weights.
Global launch of Vidu website/platform 91
Infinigence AI
AI Infrastructure, Infini-Megrez (LLM)
Potentially (API access for specific events/partners) 99
Infini-Megrez, Semi-PD, SpecEE (Apache 2.0) 98
Yes (projects on GitHub) 98
Focus on reducing AI deployment costs globally 24

The landscape reveals a dual approach by many Chinese AI providers: aggressive open-sourcing of models to achieve global reach and developer adoption, alongside offering API access. For international enterprises, the critical factor for API use is often the data hosting location and associated governance. While major Chinese cloud providers leverage their global data centers for international clients, direct API access from newer model developers often defaults to China-hosted infrastructure unless explicitly stated otherwise (e.g., MiniMax's global endpoints, ByteDance's strategy for overseas chip procurement). This distinction is paramount for non-Chinese enterprises navigating the adoption of these powerful AI capabilities.
III. Adoption by Non-Chinese Enterprises via China-Hosted/Originated Infrastructure (2024-2025)
The investigation into the adoption of China-hosted or China-originated AI services by non-Chinese enterprises for their operations outside China reveals a nuanced picture. While the allure of cost-effective and high-performing models is present, significant data governance and geopolitical concerns act as substantial deterrents for widespread, officially sanctioned enterprise adoption.
A. Direct API Access to China-Hosted Services
This category refers to non-Chinese entities directly calling APIs whose backend processing and data storage reside within mainland China.
DeepSeek: DeepSeek is a prominent example where its primary API and applications are explicitly China-hosted, with user data, including prompts and personal information, being stored on servers in China.2 The company gained considerable international attention following the release of its high-performance models like DeepSeek-R1, which was noted for its capabilities and significantly lower API costs compared to some Western providers (e.g., $2.19 per million tokens).1 The DeepSeek iOS app even became the most downloaded free app in the U.S. for a period, indicating substantial interest from individual users globally.6 This individual adoption may extend into enterprise environments through employees using these tools for work-related tasks, a phenomenon often termed "shadow IT" or "dark IT".2 However, formal, large-scale adoption by non-Chinese enterprises for their core, sensitive non-China operations via the China-hosted API is likely constrained by the data privacy, security, and regulatory risks explicitly associated with this hosting model.1
Zhipu AI (Z.ai / BigModel.cn): Zhipu AI has launched an "international-facing" platform, Z.ai, alongside its MaaS platform (bigmodel.cn).10 While Z.ai targets global users, the terms of service for the underlying BigModel Open Platform reference the laws of the People's Republic of China.67 This suggests that at least some services accessed internationally via Z.ai might be processed or governed by infrastructure within China. The company's strategy emphasizes global accessibility through open-sourcing its GLM models.10 Concrete case studies of non-Chinese enterprises specifically using Zhipu's China-hosted MaaS for their non-China operations are not prevalent in the available information. The primary international engagement appears to be driven by its open-source models or if Z.ai utilizes non-China data centers for its international clientele.
Moonshot AI (Kimi API): Moonshot AI, a Beijing-based company, offers the Kimi chatbot and an API via its Kimi Open Platform.11 There were reports of plans for U.S. market entry, and Kimi 1.5 was offered free globally, attracting international users.11 BytePlus, ByteDance's enterprise arm, also offers Kimi Chat internationally, stating compliance with international data protection regulations.75 However, the specific hosting location for Kimi API services accessed by non-Chinese enterprises for their non-China operations (whether directly from Moonshot AI or via BytePlus) is not consistently detailed as being exclusively China-hosted or utilizing international data centers. Moonshot AI's privacy policies are general regarding international data transfers, mentioning safeguards but not always specifying locations for all service types.73 Without explicit confirmation of China-hosting for specific international enterprise API usage for non-China operations, such adoption remains difficult to quantify precisely from the snippets.
MiniMax: MiniMax, based in Shanghai, has seen international consumer traction with its Talkie app.24 For its API services, MiniMax documentation notably distinguishes between "Global" (api.minimaxi.chat) and "Mainland" (api.minimax.chat) API hosts.12 This architectural decision is significant. If the "Global" API endpoint is indeed hosted on infrastructure outside mainland China, then non-Chinese enterprises using this endpoint would not be utilizing China-hosted infrastructure. This would place such usage outside the primary scope of this report's focus on China-hosted services, highlighting an important strategy by some Chinese AI firms to cater to international data residency concerns.
B. Use of AI Capabilities from Chinese Cloud Providers' China-Hosted Infrastructure
Major Chinese cloud providers—Alibaba Cloud, Tencent Cloud, and Huawei Cloud—operate extensive global networks of data centers.7 Their strategy for serving non-Chinese international clients typically involves leveraging these international (non-mainland China) data centers. This approach addresses critical concerns such as data sovereignty, latency, and compliance with regional regulations like GDPR.
Alibaba Cloud: Case studies, such as LVMH using Alibaba Cloud's AI tools, specify usage for the Chinese market.32 Announcements regarding new AI models and tools for international customers emphasize availability through their global PaaS offerings, implying use of their international data centers.7
Tencent Cloud: International clients like Telkomsel (Indonesia) and Bank Rakyat Indonesia using Tencent's Super App as a Service (TCSAS) are likely served from Tencent's data centers in Indonesia or the broader APAC region, not mainland China, for their primary operations.8 Tencent's "China Connect" solutions are designed to help international companies operate within China or connect to China.35
Huawei Cloud: The "Go-Global" solutions prominently featured by Huawei Cloud are primarily aimed at assisting Chinese enterprises in their international expansion, utilizing Huawei's global infrastructure.32 Examples like Kingsoft Office (a Chinese company) using Huawei Cloud for its global WPS office suite, or MINISO (a Chinese brand) leveraging Huawei Cloud AI for its global operations, fit this pattern.32 While international partners are mentioned, the context is often collaboration on solutions rather than non-Chinese firms routing their global, non-China operational data through Huawei's mainland China infrastructure.
There is a general lack of direct evidence in the provided 2024-2025 information showing non-Chinese enterprises deliberately choosing to use AI services hosted specifically on the mainland China infrastructure of these major Chinese cloud providers for their core business operations outside of China. The more common and logical scenario is the utilization of the providers' international or regional data centers.
C. Summary of Adoption Levels
Based on the available data for 2024-2025, the overall adoption of AI models and capabilities via China-hosted infrastructure by non-Chinese enterprises for their non-China operations appears to be nascent and largely confined to specific niches.
It is most evident at the individual developer or researcher level, or through "shadow IT" within enterprises, where the low cost and high performance of certain China-hosted APIs (like DeepSeek's) are attractive for experimentation or non-critical tasks.
Systematic, large-scale, and officially sanctioned adoption by non-Chinese multinational corporations of China-hosted AI for their core, sensitive global business operations (outside of China) is not clearly documented in the provided materials for this period. The substantial risks associated with data governance, security, and geopolitical factors seem to outweigh the benefits for most mainstream enterprises.
The following table aims to systematically capture any documented instances or strong indicators of the specific adoption pattern under investigation.
Table 2: Documented/Reported Instances & Indicators of Non-Chinese Enterprise Adoption of China-Hosted/Originated AI Services for Non-China Operations (2024-2025)

Chinese AI Provider
Specific Model/Service
Nature of International Access/Adoption
Evidence/Source Snippet(s)
Explicitly China-Hosted for this Access? (Yes/No/Unclear)
Primary User Type (Enterprise/Developer/Individual)
DeepSeek
DeepSeek-R1, V3 API, Chatbot
API access, iOS app downloads by international users. Potential "shadow IT" use in enterprises.
1
Yes (API and data storage explicitly China-hosted)
Individual, Developer, Potentially Enterprise (Shadow IT)
Zhipu AI (Z.ai)
GLM series APIs via Z.ai / BigModel.cn
International-facing Z.ai platform for API access.
10
Unclear (Z.ai is international, but MaaS terms link to PRC law, suggesting potential China backend for some services)
Developer, Potentially Enterprise
Moonshot AI (Kimi)
Kimi API via Kimi Open Platform / BytePlus
International user access to Kimi chatbot and API; planned US market entry.
11
Unclear (Moonshot is China-based; BytePlus international offering hosting not specified; privacy policy mentions intl. transfers with safeguards)
Individual, Developer, Potentially Enterprise
Alibaba Cloud
Qwen API, PAI Platform
International clients use global AZs; LVMH (French) used AI for Chinese market.
7
No (for non-China ops of intl. clients, global AZs are typical)
Enterprise (for China market ops or via global AZs)
Tencent Cloud
Hunyuan API, TCSAS
International clients (e.g., Telkomsel) use regional AZs.
8
No (for non-China ops of intl. clients, global/regional AZs are typical)
Enterprise (via global/regional AZs)
Huawei Cloud
Pangu API via AI Cloud Service
Primarily supports Chinese enterprises' global expansion using global AZs. Some intl. partners for regional solutions.
9
No (for non-China ops of intl. clients, global AZs are typical)
Enterprise (Chinese enterprises globally; some intl. partners regionally)

The table underscores that while Chinese AI providers are making their models globally accessible, direct reliance on mainland China-hosted infrastructure by non-Chinese enterprises for their external operations is limited and fraught with complexities. The ambiguity surrounding the exact hosting locations for some "international" API endpoints from China-based model developers (distinct from the major cloud providers' global AZs) further complicates a definitive assessment. Providers like MiniMax offering explicitly separate "Global" API hosts may represent a strategy to circumvent these China-hosting concerns for international clients.
IV. Contrasting Cloud Access with Self-Hosted Open-Source Models
A dominant trend in the global engagement with Chinese AI innovation is the widespread availability and adoption of open-source models. This approach offers a distinct alternative to accessing AI capabilities via China-hosted cloud infrastructure or APIs, with significant implications for data governance, control, and operational strategy for non-Chinese enterprises.
A. Prominent Open-Source Models from Chinese Providers (2024-2025)
The 2024-2025 period has seen a deluge of high-quality open-source model releases from Chinese AI companies, often rivaling Western counterparts in performance and efficiency:
DeepSeek: Models like DeepSeek-V3 and the reasoning-focused DeepSeek-R1, along with their weights and training methodologies, have been open-sourced, typically under permissive licenses like MIT.15
Zhipu AI: The GLM series (GLM-4, GLM-Z1 inference and rumination models) and the text-to-image model CogView4 are available under the MIT license, encouraging broad adoption.10
Alibaba Cloud (Qwen): The extensive Qwen family (Qwen, Qwen2, QwQ, QVQ, Qwen2.5-VL, Qwen2.5-1M for long context, and Wan2.1 for video) is a cornerstone of Alibaba's open-source strategy, primarily distributed via ModelScope and Hugging Face, often under Apache 2.0 licenses.25
01.AI (Yi): The Yi series models, including versions focused on bilingual capabilities, coding (Yi-Coder), math, reasoning, and vision-language (Yi-VL), are open-sourced under Apache 2.0.13
Moonshot AI: While Kimi chatbot is a platform, components like the Kimi-VL vision-language model and the Muon optimizer have been open-sourced.11
MiniMax: The MiniMax-01 series (Text and VL models), notable for its Linear Attention architecture, has been open-sourced under the MIT license. The Speech-02 model and an Audio-Tools GitHub repository are also available.77
ByteDance (Seed AI): Several models and frameworks, including Seed-Coder, Seed1.5-VL, the DeerFlow research framework, QuaDMix for data quality, and the UI-TARS-1.5 multimodal agent, have been released as open source.86
Baichuan AI: Early models like Baichuan-7B and Baichuan-13B, as well as the Baichuan2 series (7B, 13B) and Baichuan-Audio, are open-source, typically under Apache 2.0 with a community license required for commercial use.24
StepFun AI: This provider has actively contributed to the open-source community with models like Step1X-Edit (image editing), Step-Video-TI2V (text-to-video), Step-Audio, and Step-Video-T2V, generally under Apache 2.0 or MIT licenses.132
Infinigence AI: Focuses on AI infrastructure and has open-sourced tools like Infini-Megrez (LLM), Semi-PD (LLM serving framework), SpecEE (inference acceleration), and FlashOverlap, mostly under Apache 2.0.98
Huawei: While its flagship Pangu models are largely proprietary 43, Huawei contributes to the open-source ecosystem through its MindSpore deep learning framework (Apache 2.0) 43 and tools like the CANN (Compute Architecture for Neural Networks) Execution Provider for ONNX Runtime.137
Academic/Research Institutions: Shanghai AI Lab (OpenMMLab, open-sciencelab projects), Peking University (Open-Sora-Plan, AgentCPM-GUI in collaboration with Mianbi Intelligence), and CASIA (ScienceOne platform, though its full open-source status is less clear) also contribute significantly to open resources, though not always with commercially ready, directly downloadable models in the same vein as corporate releases.20
This strong open-source push allows international enterprises to access and utilize advanced AI technologies developed in China without direct reliance on China-hosted infrastructure for model execution.
B. Implications of Self-Hosting Chinese Open-Source Models
For non-Chinese enterprises, downloading and self-hosting these open-source models presents several advantages and considerations:
Data Governance & Security: This is the most significant advantage. By self-hosting, enterprises retain full control over their data, processing, and storage environments. This allows them to adhere to their own stringent security policies and comply with local data residency requirements (e.g., GDPR in Europe, CCPA in California), largely mitigating the risks associated with data transfer to, or storage in, mainland China.2
Customization & Control: Access to model weights and architecture enables deep customization. Enterprises can fine-tune these models on their proprietary datasets to tailor them for specific tasks and integrate them seamlessly into existing workflows, free from the constraints or limitations of a third-party API.
Cost Structure: While direct API access from some Chinese providers can be inexpensive for low-volume use, costs can escalate with scale. Self-hosting involves upfront investment in infrastructure (compute, storage) and MLOps talent, but can offer better long-term economics for high-volume or continuous workloads. It eliminates per-token API charges but introduces operational overhead.
Operational Responsibility: The enterprise assumes full responsibility for deploying, maintaining, scaling, securing, and ensuring the ethical use of the self-hosted models. This requires robust internal MLOps capabilities and governance frameworks.
Access to Innovation with Reduced Dependency: Self-hosting allows companies to leverage the cutting-edge innovations embodied in Chinese AI models without being locked into a specific vendor's cloud platform or API terms for runtime. This provides greater strategic flexibility.
C. Differentiating Factors
The choice between accessing Chinese AI via China-hosted cloud/APIs versus self-hosting open-source versions hinges on several critical factors:
Data Flow and Residency: This is paramount. China-hosted APIs inherently involve data (prompts, inputs, potentially outputs if stored by the provider) being processed and/or stored in mainland China. Self-hosting keeps all data within the enterprise's chosen, controlled environment (on-premises or a trusted third-party cloud region outside China).
Regulatory and Geopolitical Exposure: Direct use of China-hosted services exposes enterprises to Chinese data laws (e.g., Cybersecurity Law, Data Security Law, Personal Information Protection Law) and the complexities of international data transfer regulations.3 Geopolitical tensions can also impact service stability or access. Self-hosting largely shifts the primary regulatory compliance burden to the jurisdiction of the enterprise and its chosen hosting location.
Vendor Lock-in vs. Flexibility: Reliance on a specific provider's API can lead to vendor lock-in, making it difficult to switch models or platforms. Open-source models offer architectural transparency and portability, allowing enterprises to avoid such dependencies.
Access to Latest Proprietary Features vs. Stable Open-Source Versions: API access might provide quicker access to a provider's very latest, potentially proprietary, model updates or features not yet available in open-source versions. Open-source versions, while powerful, might lag slightly behind the absolute cutting edge of a rapidly iterating proprietary model.
Censorship and Bias Risks: Models accessed via China-hosted APIs may have embedded censorship or biases aligned with PRC regulations.5 While open-source models can also inherit biases from their training data, self-hosting provides the opportunity (though complex) to audit, fine-tune, or implement additional safeguards to mitigate these issues to a greater extent than a black-box API.
The strong open-source trend from Chinese AI companies can be seen as a strategic maneuver. Given the significant data governance and geopolitical hurdles associated with direct use of China-hosted services by many international entities, open-sourcing powerful models allows Chinese AI technology to achieve global diffusion and influence.20 It enables a "best of both worlds" scenario for some international users: access to advanced Chinese AI capabilities without the direct risks of China-hosted data processing. This, however, necessitates that the adopting enterprise possesses or develops the MLOps maturity to manage these models effectively and responsibly.
The following table provides a direct comparison of these two access methods across key decision-making factors.
Table 3: Comparative Analysis: China-Hosted/Originated Cloud AI Access vs. Self-Hosting of Chinese Open-Source AI Models

Feature/Consideration
Access via China-Hosted/Originated Cloud API
Self-Hosting of Chinese Open-Source Model
Data Sovereignty & Security
Lower (Data processed/stored in China, subject to PRC laws)
Higher (Enterprise controls hosting environment and data)
Regulatory Compliance (e.g., GDPR, CCPA, US DOJ rules)
Complex and high-risk for non-China data due to cross-border transfer and PRC jurisdiction
More manageable (Compliance depends on enterprise's chosen hosting and data governance)
Geopolitical Risk Exposure
Higher (Service continuity, data access can be affected by geopolitical shifts)
Lower (Insulated from direct geopolitical impact on service provisioning from China)
Model Customization & Control
Limited (Bound by API capabilities, limited fine-tuning options)
High (Full access to model weights for deep customization and fine-tuning)
Operational Responsibility
Lower (Provider manages infrastructure, model updates)
Higher (Enterprise manages deployment, infrastructure, updates, security)
Cost Structure (Initial vs. Scale)
Lower initial cost (pay-as-you-go API) but can be high at scale
Higher initial cost (infrastructure, talent) but potentially more economical at scale
Vendor Lock-in
Higher (Dependent on provider's API, terms, and pricing)
Lower (Model portability, no specific vendor dependency for runtime)
Access to Latest Proprietary Features
Potentially faster access to provider's newest, unreleased features
Access to stable open-source versions; may lag proprietary updates
Censorship Risk
Higher (Models may have PRC-aligned censorship/biases) 16
Lower (Opportunity to audit/mitigate, though inherent biases from training data can exist)
IP Protection Concerns (User Data/Inputs)
Higher (Provider terms may allow use of inputs/outputs for model improvement; data exposed to PRC jurisdiction) 3
Lower (Enterprise controls data and its use for fine-tuning)

For non-Chinese enterprises, the decision pathway often involves a trade-off. The convenience and potentially lower entry cost of a China-hosted API must be weighed against the significant control, security, and compliance benefits offered by self-hosting an open-source alternative from the same or another Chinese provider. The evidence suggests that for sensitive or core operations, the latter is increasingly the preferred route for risk-averse international organizations.
V. Key Drivers for Adoption of China-Hosted AI Services by Non-Chinese Enterprises
Despite the significant barriers, certain factors can drive non-Chinese enterprises or individuals within them to consider or adopt AI services accessed via China-hosted infrastructure. These drivers primarily revolve around compelling cost-performance ratios and access to specific, advanced capabilities.
A. Cost-Effectiveness
A major attraction of some Chinese AI models, when accessed via their native APIs, is their aggressive pricing. This is a classic market disruption strategy.
DeepSeek's API, for instance, has been highlighted for being considerably cheaper than some Western cloud provider offerings, with reported prices as low as $2.19 per million tokens.1 Its R1 model was noted for matching OpenAI's o1 quality at a fraction of the price.61
Zhipu AI has also positioned some of its GLM models competitively, with its GLM-Z1-Air model claimed to be 1/30th the cost of DeepSeek-R1 for certain operations.65
MiniMax's API pricing is also stated to be significantly lower than that of models like GPT-4.78
Alibaba's QwQ-32B model was recognized for its efficiency, potentially matching larger models with fewer parameters, which can translate to lower inference costs.120
This pronounced cost advantage can be a powerful incentive, particularly for startups, individual developers, researchers, or even larger enterprises for specific, less data-sensitive workloads where budget is a primary constraint. The economic argument becomes compelling when a Chinese AI API offers comparable performance to a leading Western model at a substantially reduced cost. This is especially true for high-volume, non-critical tasks where data sensitivity might be perceived as lower, or for users in price-sensitive markets.
B. Performance and Unique Capabilities
Beyond cost, the raw performance and unique functionalities of certain Chinese AI models can attract international interest.
Models from providers like DeepSeek (R1 for reasoning), Zhipu AI (GLM series), Alibaba (Qwen family), and Moonshot AI (Kimi for long context) are increasingly achieving performance metrics comparable or, in some specific benchmarks or tasks, even superior to established Western models.14
Specialized features, such as Kimi's ability to process very long contexts (up to 2 million Chinese characters or equivalent in tokens) 68, or models fine-tuned for specific domains like coding (e.g., DeepSeek-Coder 13), can be a strong draw if these capabilities are critical for a user's needs and readily accessible via an affordable China-hosted API.
If a Chinese AI model offers a distinct, cutting-edge capability not easily or affordably replicated by readily available Western alternatives, it can drive adoption even with the associated hosting concerns. This is particularly relevant for research and development activities or for niche applications where the specific AI capability itself is the paramount consideration. The pursuit of competitive advantage through unique AI functionalities can lead some non-Chinese entities to explore these China-hosted options, provided they can manage or accept the inherent risks for that specific use case.
C. Ease of Access and Rapid Innovation Cycles
The speed of innovation and the immediate availability of new models and features via APIs from some Chinese AI companies can be attractive.
The rapid iteration cycles, with frequent announcements of new models or significant updates, mean that developers can quickly experiment with the latest AI technologies.84
The reported popularity of DeepSeek's iOS app in the U.S. 6, achieving the status of the most downloaded free app at one point, highlights the ease of access and broad appeal of some of these services. This consumer-level accessibility can spill over into professional or enterprise use, as individuals explore these tools for work-related purposes.
This rapid pace of development and release can create a "fear of missing out" (FOMO) effect, encouraging developers and even enterprises to evaluate these China-hosted APIs to stay abreast of the latest advancements. The low barrier to entry for testing these APIs (often free tiers or very low initial costs) facilitates this exploratory adoption.
In summary, the primary drivers for any adoption of China-hosted AI services by non-Chinese entities are the compelling cost-performance ratio and access to potentially unique or leading-edge AI capabilities. For certain specialized tasks or for users who prioritize cost savings and find the performance "good enough" for their needs, China-hosted APIs can present an attractive option, despite the inherent risks.
VI. Significant Barriers and Risks for Non-Chinese Enterprises
While cost and performance can be attractive, the adoption of China-hosted AI services by non-Chinese enterprises for their non-China operations is significantly impeded by a range of substantial barriers and risks. These concerns span data governance, regulatory compliance, geopolitical factors, and operational uncertainties.
A. Data Sovereignty, Security, and Privacy Concerns
This cluster of concerns represents the most formidable obstacle.
Data Hosting in Mainland China: A primary issue is the physical location of data processing and storage. Services like DeepSeek's API explicitly state that user data, including prompts and any uploaded files, is stored on servers within mainland China.2 This immediately raises red flags for international enterprises dealing with sensitive corporate information, intellectual property, or personal data of non-Chinese individuals.
Potential for Chinese Government Access: Data hosted in China is subject to Chinese national laws, such as the Cybersecurity Law, the Data Security Law (DSL), and the Personal Information Protection Law (PIPL). These laws can, under certain circumstances, compel organizations to provide access to data to government authorities.2 The U.S. House Select Committee on the CCP alleged that DeepSeek funnels Americans' data to the PRC and covertly manipulates results to align with CCP propaganda, as required by Chinese law.16 This potential for state access is a critical deterrent for businesses that must guarantee the confidentiality and integrity of their data.
Cybersecurity Risks: Beyond lawful access, general cybersecurity vulnerabilities are a concern. The report on AI datacenter vulnerabilities highlights risks of espionage and sabotage, with many critical datacenter components being manufactured in China.18 For AI services where the underlying platform infrastructure is proprietary and closed-source (as is the case for DeepSeek's platform and apps, despite its models being open-source 5), users have limited visibility into security practices. The Cisco study finding DeepSeek failed to block harmful prompts, contrasted with GPT-4o's higher block rate, was attributed by some analysts to a rush to compete, compromising safety.142
B. Regulatory Compliance Challenges
Navigating the complex web of international and national data protection regulations is a major hurdle.
GDPR, CCPA, and Other International Regulations: Transferring personal data of EU residents (under GDPR) or Californian residents (under CCPA) to servers in China necessitates robust legal mechanisms, such as Standard Contractual Clauses (SCCs), explicit and informed consent, and thorough data transfer impact assessments. Compliance is complex and carries significant legal and financial risks if mishandled.5 DeepSeek's privacy policy, for example, has been noted for lacking detailed safeguards regarding international data transfers.5 The European Data Protection Board (EDPB) has confirmed that GDPR applies to AI model training involving EU personal data, irrespective of model location, adding another layer of scrutiny.143
Evolving Chinese Data Export Rules: China itself has an evolving framework for cross-border data transfer, which adds another layer of complexity for international companies whose data might be processed in China.17
U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ) Restrictions: New U.S. regulations, effective April 2025, restrict the outbound transfer of bulk U.S. sensitive personal data and government-related data to "countries of concern," explicitly including China (and Hong Kong and Macau).19 This rule has wide-ranging impacts on U.S. companies and their ability to use China-hosted AI services for processing such data, even for their non-China operations if U.S. sensitive data is involved.
C. Geopolitical Tensions and Trust Deficit
The broader geopolitical landscape, particularly the ongoing technological and strategic competition between the United States and China, fosters a significant trust deficit.
Western companies are increasingly wary of relying on critical infrastructure or advanced AI services hosted in China for their core global operations due to concerns about national security, economic espionage, and potential service disruptions stemming from political escalations.16
Allegations of intellectual property theft or unfair practices, such as claims that DeepSeek may have used model distillation techniques to copy capabilities from leading U.S. AI models in violation of terms of service, further erode trust.16
D. Censorship and Content Manipulation
There are documented reports and user experiences suggesting that Chinese AI models, when accessed via their native platforms, may censor content or provide responses that align with the political and ideological objectives of the Chinese Communist Party.5 DeepSeek, for instance, has been observed to avoid or distort information on topics sensitive to the PRC government.16 This inherent lack of neutrality and potential for biased information makes such models unreliable or unsuitable for many enterprise applications that require objective and comprehensive information retrieval or generation.
E. Availability of Competitive and More Trusted Alternatives
Non-Chinese enterprises have access to a mature ecosystem of AI models and services from major Western cloud providers (AWS, Microsoft Azure, Google Cloud Platform) and specialized AI companies. These alternatives often come with:
Hosting options in diverse global regions, facilitating compliance with data residency requirements.
More established frameworks for data governance, security, and responsible AI.
Greater transparency regarding training data and methodologies (though not always perfect).
Stronger contractual protections, including potential indemnification for IP infringement. The proliferation of high-quality open-source models, including many from Chinese developers themselves but available for self-hosting, also provides a viable alternative that circumvents direct reliance on China-hosted APIs.
F. Operational Risks
Service Disruption: Services hosted in China could be subject to disruption due to sudden regulatory changes within China, geopolitical events, or changes in the provider's operational strategy.
Lack of Indemnification: As noted with DeepSeek, users may bear full liability for issues such as IP infringement arising from the use of the service, with the provider disclaiming responsibility.3 This is a significant financial and legal risk for enterprises.
Support and Service Levels: Ensuring adequate and timely support for international clients using China-hosted services, especially across different time zones and languages, can be challenging.
Collectively, these barriers mean that for most non-Chinese enterprises, particularly those in Western countries or those handling sensitive data, the risks associated with using China-hosted AI services for their non-China operations currently outweigh the potential benefits of cost or specific capabilities. The data governance concerns, in particular, act as a near-insurmountable hurdle for mainstream adoption in regulated industries or for applications involving customer PII or valuable corporate IP. This reality is implicitly acknowledged by the Chinese AI firms themselves through their aggressive push towards open-sourcing their models, providing an alternative, less risky pathway for international technology diffusion.
VII. Strategic Implications and Recommendations for International Enterprises
The emergence of powerful and cost-effective AI models from China, accessible via various means, presents both opportunities and significant challenges for international enterprises. Navigating this landscape requires a carefully considered strategy that balances the potential for innovation and efficiency gains against substantial risks, particularly when considering services hosted within mainland China.
A. Framework for Evaluation
Enterprises must adopt a structured approach to evaluating any potential use of Chinese AI models, especially those accessed via China-hosted infrastructure.
Rigorous Risk-Benefit Analysis: A thorough assessment is paramount. This involves quantifying the potential cost savings or performance advantages against the full spectrum of risks: data security, privacy violations, regulatory non-compliance (GDPR, CCPA, US DOJ rules, etc.), geopolitical instability, IP infringement, and reputational damage. The analysis should be specific to the proposed use case.
Data Sensitivity Classification: Not all data is equal. Enterprises must classify the data intended for processing by AI systems. Highly sensitive data—including proprietary corporate information, customer personally identifiable information (PII), financial records, health data, or strategic plans—should generally be prohibited from processing on China-hosted platforms for operations outside of China. Less sensitive, anonymized, or publicly available data might present a lower risk profile.
Use-Case Specificity: Decisions should not be blanket approvals or rejections but should be made on a case-by-case basis. A non-critical, internal R&D project using anonymized data might have a different risk calculus than a customer-facing application processing live PII. The potential impact of a data breach or service disruption must be evaluated for each specific application.
B. Prioritizing Self-Hosting for Chinese Open-Source Models
For enterprises wishing to leverage the technological advancements of Chinese AI, the most prudent approach for core or sensitive applications is to download and self-host open-source models.
This strategy provides maximum control over the data environment, ensuring that data processing and storage occur on trusted infrastructure—either on-premises or within a secure cloud environment managed by the enterprise or a trusted non-Chinese provider. This directly addresses data sovereignty and many security concerns.2
To effectively implement this, enterprises must invest in or develop robust MLOps (Machine Learning Operations) capabilities. This includes expertise in model deployment, fine-tuning, monitoring, scaling, security, and governance for self-hosted models.
C. Due Diligence on "Global" API Endpoints from Chinese Providers
Some Chinese AI companies, like MiniMax, offer "Global" API endpoints distinct from their "Mainland" ones.12 If an enterprise considers using such services:
Thorough due diligence is essential to verify the actual physical location of data processing and storage for traffic routed through these "Global" endpoints.
Scrutinize terms of service, privacy policies, and data processing agreements for explicit commitments regarding data residency, cross-border data transfer mechanisms, and applicable legal jurisdictions for international users. Ambiguity should be treated with caution.
D. Technical and Contractual Safeguards (If China-Hosted Use is Deemed Low-Risk and Unavoidable for a Specific, Limited Use Case)
In rare instances where a specific, low-risk use case might warrant considering a China-hosted API (e.g., for unique capabilities not otherwise available and non-sensitive data), enterprises should implement maximum safeguards:
Client-Side Encryption: Encrypt data before sending it to the API, if the nature of the service allows.
Data Minimization and Anonymization: Send only the absolute minimum data required and anonymize or pseudonymize it to the greatest extent possible.
Contractual Protections: Attempt to negotiate specific contractual terms regarding data handling, security standards, audit rights, and liability. However, be aware that standard API terms from providers like DeepSeek may offer little to no indemnification and place most liability on the user.3
E. Continuous Monitoring of the Regulatory and Geopolitical Landscape
The legal and geopolitical environment is dynamic.
Enterprises must stay continuously informed about evolving data protection laws globally (e.g., new interpretations of GDPR concerning AI 143, U.S. DOJ restrictions on data transfers to China 19) and within China itself (e.g., data export regulations 17).
The state of U.S.-China relations and other international dynamics can rapidly alter risk assessments and service viability.
F. Exploring Hybrid Approaches and "Shadow IT" Mitigation
A hybrid strategy might involve using China-hosted APIs for limited, non-sensitive R&D, benchmarking, or experimentation, while deploying production systems involving sensitive data using self-hosted open-source models or trusted Western AI providers.
Recognize the potential for "shadow IT," where employees or development teams might independently use free or low-cost China-hosted AI tools due to their performance or cost.2 Enterprises should establish clear internal policies on the use of external AI services, provide education on the associated risks, and offer approved, secure alternatives to meet developer needs.
The overarching strategic implication for international enterprises is that while Chinese AI offers compelling technological advancements, direct reliance on China-hosted infrastructure for core, non-China operations carries substantial and often unacceptable risks. A cautious, risk-aware approach is essential, with a strong preference for leveraging Chinese AI innovation through self-hosted open-source models on trusted infrastructure. This allows access to the technology while maintaining control over critical data assets and mitigating regulatory and geopolitical exposures. Investment in internal MLOps and data governance capabilities is thus becoming strategically vital for companies wishing to safely and effectively harness global AI innovations, irrespective of their origin.
VIII. Outlook for 2025 and Beyond
The landscape for international adoption of China-hosted AI services is expected to remain complex and heavily influenced by technological advancements, geopolitical currents, and evolving regulatory frameworks through 2025 and beyond.
A. Projected Trends in International Adoption of China-Hosted AI
Direct adoption of AI models and services specifically hosted within mainland China by non-Chinese enterprises for their operations outside of China is likely to remain limited for mainstream and sensitive use cases. The significant concerns regarding data governance, security, and geopolitical risks will continue to act as major deterrents.1
Adoption, where it occurs, will likely be concentrated in several specific areas:
Individual developers, researchers, and hobbyists attracted by the low cost, high performance, or unique features of certain Chinese models available via China-hosted APIs.
Startups and SMEs in less data-sensitive sectors or those with a higher risk tolerance, particularly if the cost savings are substantial.
"Shadow IT" usage within larger enterprises, where employees may use easily accessible China-hosted tools for specific tasks without full corporate oversight or awareness of the data implications.2
Enterprises in regions with closer political and economic ties to China, which may have different perspectives on data governance and geopolitical risk.
The primary and more strategically sound method for international enterprises to leverage Chinese AI innovation will continue to be through the download and self-hosting of open-source models provided by Chinese firms. This approach allows access to advanced technology while maintaining control over data and the hosting environment.
B. Evolving Strategies of Chinese AI Providers in the Global Market
Chinese AI providers are aware of the international concerns and are adapting their strategies accordingly:
Continued Emphasis on Open Source: Expect a sustained, strong push towards open-sourcing key models and tools.20 This strategy allows Chinese AI technology to gain global traction, build developer ecosystems, and bypass some of the direct geopolitical and data security hurdles associated with their commercial cloud services hosted in China.
Expansion of International Data Center Presence (for some): Some Chinese AI providers may increasingly offer services via data centers located outside mainland China to cater specifically to international clients. Examples include MiniMax's "Global" API endpoint (if hosted internationally) 12 and ByteDance's reported plans to secure significant AI chip capacity through facilities outside China.89 This indicates a move to provide international hosting options to alleviate data residency concerns.
Efforts Towards Compliance and Trust-Building: Chinese providers targeting international markets will likely increase their efforts to demonstrate compliance with international data protection standards and obtain relevant certifications. However, overcoming the fundamental trust deficit related to data access under Chinese law will remain a significant challenge.
Focus on Niche Applications and Vertical Markets: Providers may focus on areas where their AI models have a demonstrable and unique advantage, hoping the specialized capability will outweigh generalized concerns for specific international use cases.
Partnerships and Localized Offerings: Collaboration with local partners in different regions to offer more tailored and potentially locally hosted AI solutions could be another strategy, as seen with some of Huawei Cloud's and Tencent Cloud's regional initiatives.8
C. Impact of Geopolitics and Regulations
The geopolitical and regulatory environment will continue to be a defining factor:
U.S. Export Controls: Restrictions on the export of advanced AI chips and manufacturing equipment to China will persist, shaping the trajectory of Chinese AI hardware development and likely spurring further innovation in model efficiency and alternative hardware solutions.20
Western Scrutiny of Data Flows: Expect increased scrutiny from U.S., EU, and other allied governments regarding data transfers to China and the use of China-hosted AI services, potentially leading to further advisories, restrictions, or regulatory requirements for enterprises.18
China's Data Governance Framework: China's own evolving data security, personal information protection, and cross-border data transfer regulations will continue to influence how both domestic and international companies can operate and interact with data within and across its borders.17
Global AI Governance Efforts: International dialogues on AI safety, security, and ethics (e.g., AI Safety Summits, OECD AI Principles) will attempt to establish global norms. The extent to which Chinese AI companies and the Chinese government align with and adopt these norms will impact international trust and collaboration.139
D. Recommendations for International Policymakers and Industry Bodies
To help navigate this complex environment, policymakers and industry bodies in non-Chinese jurisdictions should consider:
Developing and disseminating clear, actionable risk assessment frameworks and guidelines for enterprises considering the use of AI services, particularly those hosted in jurisdictions with differing legal and data governance regimes.
Promoting the development and adoption of international standards for AI safety, security, ethics, and transparency that can be applied globally, fostering a common understanding of best practices.
Supporting research and development into privacy-enhancing technologies (PETs), such as federated learning, homomorphic encryption, and confidential computing, which could potentially mitigate some risks associated with cross-border data processing for AI.
Encouraging transparency from all AI providers, regardless of origin, regarding their data handling practices, model training datasets, algorithmic biases, and security measures.
Fostering international dialogues on AI governance that include diverse stakeholders, including governments, industry, academia, and civil society, to build common ground and address shared challenges.
The outlook for 2025 and beyond suggests a diverging path for international engagement with Chinese AI. Direct consumption of China-hosted AI services by non-Chinese enterprises for their global operations will likely remain cautious and limited, primarily driven by highly specific cost-benefit analyses for non-sensitive applications. In contrast, the adoption of Chinese open-source AI models, self-hosted on trusted infrastructure, is poised for more significant growth as it allows international entities to tap into Chinese innovation while maintaining greater control and mitigating key risks. Chinese AI providers, aware of these global realities, will likely continue to adapt, emphasizing open-source contributions and potentially expanding their non-China-hosted service offerings to navigate a complex and competitive international landscape. The overarching "Geopolitical AI Cold War" will continue to cast a long shadow, making AI sourcing decisions increasingly strategic for enterprises worldwide.
IX. Conclusions
The investigation into the adoption by non-Chinese enterprises of Chinese AI models and capabilities via China-hosted or China-originated cloud infrastructure during 2024-2025 reveals a landscape characterized by immense technological progress from Chinese providers, juxtaposed with significant and, for many international firms, prohibitive risks.
Limited Direct Adoption of China-Hosted Services for Non-China Operations: There is minimal evidence of widespread, officially sanctioned adoption by non-Chinese multinational corporations of AI services hosted within mainland China for their core business operations outside of China. The primary drivers for any such consideration—cost-effectiveness and access to high-performing models—are largely overshadowed by deep-seated concerns regarding data security, privacy, regulatory compliance with international laws (like GDPR and new US DOJ rules), and geopolitical tensions. The potential for Chinese government access to data stored or processed in China remains a critical deterrent.
Open Source as the Primary Conduit for International Engagement: The most significant pathway for international enterprises to leverage Chinese AI innovation is through the download and self-hosting of the numerous advanced open-source models released by Chinese AI companies. This approach allows organizations to benefit from Chinese technological advancements while maintaining control over their data, infrastructure, and regulatory compliance within their own trusted environments. This trend underscores a strategic adaptation by Chinese AI firms to diffuse their technology globally despite direct market access challenges for their China-hosted services.
Distinction in Cloud Provider Strategies: Major Chinese cloud providers (Alibaba Cloud, Tencent Cloud, Huawei Cloud) possess global data center footprints. When serving international clients for their non-China operations, these providers typically utilize their international or regional data centers. Their "China Connect" solutions are generally aimed at facilitating international business within China or helping Chinese companies expand globally, rather than routing global non-China enterprise AI workloads through mainland China infrastructure.
Ambiguity for Some Direct API Providers: For newer AI model developers offering direct APIs (e.g., DeepSeek, Zhipu AI, Moonshot AI), the default hosting is often their domestic Chinese infrastructure. While some, like DeepSeek, are explicit about China hosting for their primary APIs, others are launching "international" platforms or, like MiniMax, offering distinct "Global" API endpoints. The precise data processing and storage locations for these international offerings require careful, ongoing scrutiny by potential enterprise users. ByteDance's strategy to procure AI chips via non-China facilities further signals a move by some to decouple international AI service delivery from mainland China infrastructure.
"Shadow IT" as a Potential Vector: The compelling cost-performance of some China-hosted APIs, particularly from providers like DeepSeek, may lead to adoption by individual developers or teams within non-Chinese enterprises ("shadow IT"), potentially without full corporate awareness or risk assessment. This presents an internal governance challenge for international companies.
Strategic Imperative for Non-Chinese Enterprises: International enterprises must adopt a highly cautious and risk-aware approach. A robust framework for evaluating data sensitivity, use-case criticality, and the full spectrum of data governance and geopolitical risks is essential. For most, self-hosting Chinese open-source models on trusted infrastructure will be the preferred strategy to access Chinese AI innovation securely. Investment in internal MLOps and data governance capabilities is crucial for this approach.
In conclusion, while the technological capabilities of Chinese AI providers are rapidly advancing and gaining global recognition, the direct utilization of their China-hosted AI services by non-Chinese enterprises for global operations remains a niche activity, heavily constrained by legitimate and significant concerns. The open-source movement is, therefore, the dominant mechanism through which Chinese AI innovation is currently being accessed and integrated by the wider international community in 2024-2025. This dynamic is likely to persist as long as the current data governance and geopolitical landscapes prevail.
Works cited
AWS, Microsoft, Google, Others Make DeepSeek-R1 AI Model Available on Their Platforms, accessed May 19, 2025, https://campustechnology.com/articles/2025/02/04/aws-microsoft-google-others-make-deepseek-r1-ai-model-available-on-their-platforms.aspx
What is DeepSeek, and why does it matter? | Thought Leadership - Baker Botts, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.bakerbotts.com/thought-leadership/publications/2025/january/what-is-deepseek-and-why-does-it-matter
DeepSeek: Legal Considerations for Enterprise Users | Insights | Ropes & Gray LLP, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.ropesgray.com/en/insights/alerts/2025/01/deepseek-legal-considerations-for-enterprise-users
A deep(er) dive into DeepSeek's privacy policies - Digiday, accessed May 19, 2025, https://digiday.com/media/a-deeper-dive-into-deepseeks-privacy-policies/
DeepSeek Security, Privacy, and Governance: Hidden Risks in Open-Source AI, accessed May 19, 2025, https://blog.theori.io/deepseek-security-privacy-and-governance-hidden-risks-in-open-source-ai-125958db9d93
A Deep-Dive Into DeepSeek: The AI That Has Taken the World by Storm, accessed May 19, 2025, https://thesciencesurvey.com/news/2025/04/30/a-deep-dive-into-deepseek-the-ai-that-has-taken-the-world-by-storm/
Alibaba Cloud Strengthens AI Capabilities with Innovations for ..., accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.alibabacloud.com/blog/alibaba-cloud-strengthens-ai-capabilities-with-innovations-for-international-customers_602126
Tencent Cloud showcases super app solution at MWC 2025, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.cloudcomputing-news.net/news/tencent-cloud-showcases-super-app-solution-at-mwc-2025/
Accelerate AI-native, amplify success: Huawei Cloud unveiled new cloud services and solutions at MWC 2025 - Data Center Dynamics, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.datacenterdynamics.com/en/product-news/accelerate-ai-native-amplify-success-huawei-cloud-unveiled-new-cloud-services-and-solutions-at-mwc-2025/
Zhipu.AI's Open-Source Power Play: Blazing-Fast GLM Models ..., accessed May 19, 2025, https://syncedreview.com/2025/04/16/zhipu-ais-open-source-power-play-blazing-fast-glm-models-global-expansion-ahead-of-potential-ipo/
Moonshot AI - Wikipedia, accessed May 19, 2025, https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Moonshot_AI
Official MiniMax Model Context Protocol (MCP) server that enables interaction with powerful Text to Speech, image generation and video generation APIs. - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/MiniMax-AI/MiniMax-MCP
01.AI - Wikipedia, accessed May 19, 2025, https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/01.AI
Top 6 Chinese AI Models Like DeepSeek (LLMs) You Should Know - Index.dev, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.index.dev/blog/chinese-ai-models-deepseek
DeepSeek's release of an open-weight frontier AI model, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.iiss.org/publications/strategic-comments/2025/04/deepseeks-release-of-an-open-weight-frontier-ai-model/
DeepSeek report - Select Committee on the CCP |, accessed May 19, 2025, https://selectcommitteeontheccp.house.gov/sites/evo-subsites/selectcommitteeontheccp.house.gov/files/evo-media-document/DeepSeek%20Final.pdf
China Data Protection and Cybersecurity: Annual Review of 2024 and Outlook for 2025 (II), accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.twobirds.com/en/insights/2025/china/china-data-protection-and-cybersecurity-annual-review-of-2024-and-outlook-for-2025-(ii)
Exclusive: Every AI Datacenter Is Vulnerable to Chinese Espionage, Report Says - Time, accessed May 19, 2025, https://time.com/7279123/ai-datacenter-superintelligence-china-trump-report/
New DOJ Restrictions on Cross-Border Data Transactions Take Effect April 8: Ten Questions as Your Business Prepares to Comply - Wiley Rein, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.wiley.law/alert-New-DOJ-Restrictions-on-Cross-Border-Data-Transactions-Take-Effect-April-8
US-China AI Gap: 2025 Analysis of Model Performance, Investment, and Innovation - Recorded Future, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.recordedfuture.com/research/measuring-the-us-china-ai-gap
Promising Topics for U.S.–China Dialogues on AI Risks and Governance - arXiv, accessed May 19, 2025, https://arxiv.org/html/2505.07468v1
Strategic Snapshot: China's AI Ambitions - The Jamestown Foundation, accessed May 19, 2025, https://jamestown.org/program/strategic-snapshot-chinas-ai-ambitions/
China's AI Surge: Exploring the Context – ERI - Eurasian Research Institute, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.eurasian-research.org/publication/chinas-ai-surge-exploring-the-context/
Rising Chinese AI Firms To Watch in 2025 - CCN.com, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.ccn.com/news/technology/beyond-deepseek-rising-chinese-ai-firms-to-watch-in-2025/
Alibaba's Open-Source AI Journey - Alizila, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.alizila.com/alibabas-open-source-ai-journey-innovation-collaboration-and-future-visions/
Alibaba's Open-Source AI Journey: Innovation, Collaboration, and Future Visions, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.alibabacloud.com/blog/alibabas-open-source-ai-journey-innovation-collaboration-and-future-visions_602026
Alibaba Introduces Open-Source Model for Video Creation and Editing, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.alibabacloud.com/blog/602226
Alibaba Cloud Unveils AI Models and Tools for International Customers - Alizila, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.alizila.com/alibaba-cloud-unveils-ai-models-and-tools-for-international-customers/
Alibaba Cloud Strengthens AI Capabilities with Innovations for International Customers, accessed May 19, 2025, https://laotiantimes.com/2025/04/08/alibaba-cloud-strengthens-ai-capabilities-with-innovations-for-international-customers/
Alibaba Cloud's AI Models Power Real-world Applications Across Industries in China, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.alizila.com/alibaba-clouds-ai-models-power-real-world-applications-across-industries-in-china/
Cloud Giant Alibaba Invests $53B In AI Infrastructure As Stock Surges, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.crn.com/news/cloud/2025/cloud-giant-alibaba-invests-53b-in-ai-infrastructure-as-stock-surges
How Many Companies Use Cloud Computing? - Alibaba Cloud Community, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.alibabacloud.com/blog/how-many-companies-use-cloud-computing_602186
static.www.tencent.com, accessed May 19, 2025, https://static.www.tencent.com/uploads/2025/03/19/f55938d61be94cf9700a971a4db08809.pdf
tencent/HunyuanVideo - Hugging Face, accessed May 19, 2025, https://huggingface.co/tencent/HunyuanVideo
Tencent Cloud and Tabelog Partner to Provide Convenience to ..., accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.tencentcloud.com/dynamic/news-details/100672
2024 Tencent Global Digital Ecosystem Summit, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.tencentcloud.com/act/pro/2024gdes
Case Studies - Tencent Cloud, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.tencentcloud.com/document/product/1172/52329
Tencent Cloud Unveils AI-Driven Innovations at WTO Conference Empowering the Future of Digital Transformation, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.tencentcloud.com/dynamic/news-details/100625
Tencent Cloud Invests IDR 8 Trillion! Indonesia to Have an Ultra-Advanced Data Center, accessed May 19, 2025, https://intimedia.id/read/tencent-cloud-invests-idr-8-trillion-indonesia-to-have-an-ultraadvanced-data-center
Tencent Cloud Global Infrastructure, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.tencentcloud.com/global-infrastructure
Tencent Cloud launches region in Osaka, Japan - DCD - Data Center Dynamics, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.datacenterdynamics.com/en/news/tencent-cloud-launches-region-in-osaka-japan/
Tencent Cloud - Wikipedia, accessed May 19, 2025, https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tencent_Cloud
Huawei PanGu - Wikipedia, accessed May 19, 2025, https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Huawei_PanGu
Huawei's Pangu Ultra MoE: A Breakthrough in AI Language Models - UBOS.tech, accessed May 19, 2025, https://ubos.tech/news/huaweis-pangu-ultra-moe-a-breakthrough-in-ai-language-models/
Huawei | Capacity Media, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.capacitymedia.com/huawei?0000017e-9240-d14b-a37e-9a5a74200001-page=3
Huawei Cloud unveils solutions for global business expansion with 30+ partners at Go-Global Summit 2025 - Data Center Dynamics, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.datacenterdynamics.com/en/product-news/huawei-cloud-unveils-solutions-for-global-business-expansion-with-30-partners-at-go-global-summit-2025/
The Shortest Path, The Golden Route: Huawei Cloud Announced Six Collaborative Initiatives for Chinese Enterprises to Thrive in Asia Pacific - PR Newswire, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.prnewswire.com/apac/news-releases/the-shortest-path-the-golden-route-huawei-cloud-announced-six-collaborative-initiatives-for-chinese-enterprises-to-thrive-in-asia-pacific-302412691.html
Blog - Baidu Research, accessed May 19, 2025, https://research.baidu.com/blog
Baidu Launches AI Open Program to Empower Developers in Embracing MCP - AIbase, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.aibase.com/news/17525
Baidu launches new AI model despite high competition - Tech in Asia, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.techinasia.com/news/baidu-launches-new-ai-model-despite-high-competition
Baidu Q4 financial report · TechNode, accessed May 19, 2025, https://technode.com/2025/02/20/baidu-q4-financial-report-ai-cloud-revenue-surges-offsets-losses/
China and the world's AI race: Baidu's new reasoning model - TechHQ, accessed May 19, 2025, https://techhq.com/2025/03/china-and-the-worlds-ai-race-baidus-new-reasoning-model/
Baidu's Ernie 4.5 Outperforms GPT 4.5 By A Mile - Labellerr, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.labellerr.com/blog/baidu-launches-ernie-4-5-and-x1/
Form 20-F for Baidu INC filed 03/28/2025, accessed May 19, 2025, https://ir.baidu.com/static-files/aa26913e-2e09-4ca2-be14-ce755b68adac
The 2025 AI Index Report | Stanford HAI, accessed May 19, 2025, https://hai.stanford.edu/ai-index/2025-ai-index-report
China's Baidu to release next-gen AI model in 2025 | CoinMarketCap, accessed May 19, 2025, https://coinmarketcap.com/academy/article/0cd8311e-a03b-445f-8dc2-5c31ea7e410a
What is Deep Seek? | DeepSeek AI Blog, accessed May 19, 2025, https://deepseek.ai/blog/what-is-deep-seek
Deepseek introduces new technologies to the AI world - The Daily ..., accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.dailycardinal.com/article/2025/03/deepseek-introduces-new-technologies-to-the-ai-world
DeepSeek · GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/deepseek-ai
deepseek-ai/DeepSeek-V3 - Hugging Face, accessed May 19, 2025, https://huggingface.co/deepseek-ai/DeepSeek-V3
Taking Stock of the DeepSeek Shock | FSI - Stanford Cyber Policy Center, accessed May 19, 2025, https://cyber.fsi.stanford.edu/publication/taking-stock-deepseek-shock
China's March from Imitation to Innovation: The Case of DeepSeek | Cato at Liberty Blog, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.cato.org/blog/chinas-march-imitation-innovation-case-deepseek
DeepSeek Platform, accessed May 19, 2025, https://platform.deepseek.com/
Z.ai & THUKEG · GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/THUDM
Zhipu AI Launches New Domain Z.ai and Open-Sources 32B/9B GLM Model Series - AIbase, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.aibase.com/news/17132
Z.ai Unveils New GLM Open-Source Models with World-Class Reasoning Performance, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/zai-unveils-new-glm-open-source-models-with-world-class-reasoning-performance-302429306.html
Big Model Open Platform User Agreement - ZHIPU·AI, accessed May 19, 2025, https://bigmodel.cn/dev/howuse/useragreement
Moonshot AI's open-source Kimi-VL tackles text, images and video ..., accessed May 19, 2025, https://the-decoder.com/moonshot-ais-open-source-kimi-vl-tackles-text-images-and-video-with-just-2-8-billion-parameters/
Moonshot AI, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.moonshot.cn/
Kimi AI: Redefining the Future of Artificial Intelligence - Enterprise IT World MEA, accessed May 19, 2025, https://enterpriseitworldmea.com/kimi-ai-redefining-the-future-of-artificial-intelligence/
Moonshot AI: Betting Big on Long-Context, Confronting the Challenges of Scale and Reliability, accessed May 19, 2025, https://datainnovation.org/2025/01/moonshot-ai-betting-big-on-long-context-confronting-the-challenges-of-scale-and-reliability/
Moonshot AI - Products, Competitors, Financials, Employees, Headquarters Locations, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.cbinsights.com/company/tsuki-no-anmen
Kimi OpenPlatform Privacy Policy - Moonshot AI - Open Platform, accessed May 19, 2025, https://test-platform.moonshot.ai/docs/agreement/userprivacy.en-US
Privacy Policy - Moonshot AI, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.moonshot-ai.com/moonshot-ai-privacy-policy/
Moonshot AI Kimi Chat: Revolutionizing Conversations - BytePlus, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.byteplus.com/en/topic/514213
MiniMaxAI (MiniMax) - Hugging Face, accessed May 19, 2025, https://huggingface.co/MiniMaxAI
Forget the price wars—MiniMax goes open-source to rewrite the AI playbook - Kr Asia, accessed May 19, 2025, https://kr-asia.com/forget-the-price-wars-minimax-goes-open-source-to-rewrite-the-ai-playbook
National Supercomputing Internet Platform Launches MiniMax ..., accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.aibase.com/news/17205
MiniMax-AI/MiniMax-01: The official repo of MiniMax-Text-01 and MiniMax-VL-01, large-language-model & vision-language-model based on Linear Attention - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/MiniMax-AI/MiniMax-01
The official GitHub Page for MiniMax, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/MiniMax-AI/MiniMax-AI.github.io
MiniMax (company) - Wikipedia, accessed May 19, 2025, https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/MiniMax_(company)
MiniMax MCP JS - UBOS.tech, accessed May 19, 2025, https://ubos.tech/mcp/minimax-mcp-js/
MiniMax - UBOS.tech, accessed May 19, 2025, https://ubos.tech/mcp/minimax/
01-ai/Yi: A series of large language models trained from scratch by developers @01-ai - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/01-ai/Yi
Student Researcher – Doubao (Seed) – Foundation Model AI Platform – 2025 Start (PhD) - Office of Career and Professional Development - Georgia Southern University, accessed May 19, 2025, https://ocpd.georgiasouthern.edu/jobs/bytedance-inc-student-researcher-doubao-seed-foundation-model-ai-platform-2025-start-phd-2/
ByteDance-Seed - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/ByteDance-Seed
ByteDance Restructures AI: ByteDance AI Lab Merges into Seed AI - AIbase, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.aibase.com/news/17204
ByteDance dropped UI-TARS-1.5 on Hugging Face An open-source SOTA multi modal agent built upon a powerful vision-language model. It Surpass OPENAI operator on ALL benchmarks and achieves 42.5% on OSWORLD : r/singularity - Reddit, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.reddit.com/r/singularity/comments/1kf6xbw/bytedance_dropped_uitars15_on_hugging_face_an/
ByteDance AI chip access strategy questions export control effectiveness, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.cloudcomputing-news.net/news/bytedance-ai-chip-access-strategy-questions-export-control-effectiveness/
ShengShu Technology, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.shengshu-ai.com/home
Vidu AI Video Generation Model by Shenshu Technology Officially Launched Globally - Convert Images/Text to Video - AIbase, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.aibase.com/news/10666
Vidu Q1 Officially Launched: Higher Definition, Smoother Frame Rates, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.aibase.com/news/17390
ShengShu Technology Announces Vidu 2.0, Offering the Industry's ..., accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/shengshu-technology-announces-vidu-2-0--offering-the-industrys-fastest-generative-video-302351677.html
Vidu AI: AI Video Generator - Text & Image to Video in Seconds, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.vidu.com/
Shanghai accelerates high-quality development of its artificial intelligence industry, accessed May 19, 2025, https://en.people.cn/n3/2025/0506/c90000-20311017.html
Shanghai takes the lead in promoting AI development for shared progress of mankind, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.shine.cn/opinion/2504304172/
infinigence/LVEval: Repository of LV-Eval Benchmark - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/infinigence/LVEval
Infinigence - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/infinigence
Overview - WWW'25 AgentSociety Challenge, accessed May 19, 2025, https://tsinghua-fib-lab.github.io/AgentSocietyChallenge/pages/overview.html
Tsinghua Collaborates with MemSET Intelligence to Open Source ..., accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.aibase.com/news/18058
Tsinghua AIR, accessed May 19, 2025, https://air.tsinghua.edu.cn/en/
PKU-YuanGroup/Open-Sora-Plan: This project aim to ... - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/PKU-YuanGroup/Open-Sora-Plan
Peking University Berggruen Research Center Fellowship, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.oir.pku.edu.cn/system/_content/download.jsp?urltype=news.DownloadAttachUrl&owner=1409797161&wbfileid=16444111
26-27 April 2025 – Workshop on Philosophy and AI (PHAI) (第二届哲学与人工智能研讨会) at the Venue Berggruen Institute China Center, No. 54 Yannan Garden, Peking University, Beijing - AI & Humanity Lab, accessed May 19, 2025, https://ai-humanity.net/26-27-april-2025-workshop-on-philosophy-and-ai-phai-%E7%AC%AC%E4%BA%8C%E5%B1%8A%E5%93%B2%E5%AD%A6%E4%B8%8E%E4%BA%BA%E5%B7%A5%E6%99%BA%E8%83%BD%E7%A0%94%E8%AE%A8%E4%BC%9A-at-the-venue-ber/
PKU-Baichuan-MLSystemLab - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/PKU-Baichuan-MLSystemLab
Researchers from Fudan University and Shanghai AI Lab Introduces DOLPHIN: A Closed-Loop Framework for Automating Scientific Research with Iterative Feedback - MarkTechPost, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.marktechpost.com/2025/01/12/researchers-from-fudan-university-and-shanghai-ai-lab-introduces-dolphin-a-closed-loop-framework-for-automating-scientific-research-with-iterative-feedback/
AI for Science Center@Shanghai Artificial Intelligence Laboratory ..., accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/open-sciencelab
ADLab of Shanghai AI Lab, accessed May 19, 2025, https://pjlab-adg.github.io/
2025 STCSM "General Artificial Intelligence Large Model" Basic Research Special Program (First Round), accessed May 19, 2025, https://research.shanghai.nyu.edu/resources/research-grants/funding-opportunities/2025-stcsm-general-artificial-intelligence-large
Chinese Institute Launches AI-powered Research Platform "ScienceOne", accessed May 19, 2025, https://english.cas.cn/newsroom/cas_media/202505/t20250507_1042601.shtml
Institute of Automation Chinese Academy of Sciences - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/ia-cas
MindSpore - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/mindspore-ai
PaddlePaddle · GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/paddlepaddle
deepseek-ai (DeepSeek) - Hugging Face, accessed May 19, 2025, https://huggingface.co/deepseek-ai
THUDM (Z.ai & THUKEG) - Hugging Face, accessed May 19, 2025, https://huggingface.co/THUDM
Moonshot AI - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/moonshotai
The Rise of MiniMax Audio: Redefining Text-to-Speech with Hyper-Realistic AI Voices, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.abdulazizahwan.com/2025/04/the-rise-of-minimax-audio-redefining-text-to-speech-with-hyper-realistic-ai-voices.html
01.AI - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/01-ai
Zhipu AI Secures 500 Million RMB in Funding to Support Global Open-Source Community, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.aibase.com/news/17296
Alibaba Unveils QwQ-32B AI Model, Challenges DeepSeek and ..., accessed May 19, 2025, https://opentools.ai/news/alibaba-unveils-qwq-32b-ai-model-challenges-deepseek-and-openai
Alibaba Unveils its Latest Open-Source Video Generation Model, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.alibabagroup.com/document-1851424828087599104
01-ai/Yi-VL-34B - Hugging Face, accessed May 19, 2025, https://huggingface.co/01-ai/Yi-VL-34B
01-ai - Hugging Face, accessed May 19, 2025, https://huggingface.co/01-ai
Question · 01-ai/Yi-34B at cdd371a27cd7a7ed5da76f0ad2cc360aa3a41ae7 - Hugging Face, accessed May 19, 2025, https://huggingface.co/01-ai/Yi-34B/blob/cdd371a27cd7a7ed5da76f0ad2cc360aa3a41ae7/Question
MiniMax-01 is Now Open-Source: Scaling Lightning Attention for the AI Agent Era, accessed May 19, 2025, https://huggingface.co/blog/MiniMax-AI/minimax01
Bonus Exclusive | Baichuan Intelligence Hits the Brakes, Adjusts Medical ToB, and Basic R&D Comes to a Halt, accessed May 19, 2025, https://eu.36kr.com/en/p/3210061076562823
Beyond DeepSeek: An Overview of Chinese AI Tigers and Their ..., accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.topbots.com/chinese-ai-tigers-overview/
baichuan-inc/Baichuan2-7B-Base - Hugging Face, accessed May 19, 2025, https://huggingface.co/baichuan-inc/Baichuan2-7B-Base
Baichuan-Audio: A Unified Framework for End-to-End Speech Interaction - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/baichuan-inc/Baichuan-Audio
Baichuan - Wikipedia, accessed May 19, 2025, https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Baichuan
Meet China's top six AI unicorns: who are leading the wave of AI in China - TechNode, accessed May 19, 2025, https://technode.com/2025/01/09/meet-chinas-top-six-ai-unicorns-who-are-leading-the-wave-of-ai-in-china/
stepfun-ai (StepFun) - Hugging Face, accessed May 19, 2025, https://huggingface.co/stepfun-ai
Step-Video-TI2V Technical Report: A State-of-the-Art Text-Driven Image-to-Video Generation Model - arXiv, accessed May 19, 2025, https://arxiv.org/html/2503.11251v1
Open-Source Revolution! Step1X-Edit Lands on Hugging Face, Generating Images with Natural Language, Rivaling GPT-4o! - AIbase, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.aibase.com/news/17601
stepfun-ai/Step1X-Edit: A SOTA open-source image editing model, which aims to provide comparable performance against the closed-source models like GPT-4o and Gemini 2 Flash. - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/stepfun-ai/Step1X-Edit
stepfun-ai - GitHub, accessed May 19, 2025, https://github.com/stepfun-ai
Huawei - CANN | onnxruntime - GitHub Pages, accessed May 19, 2025, https://fs-eire.github.io/onnxruntime/docs/execution-providers/community-maintained/CANN-ExecutionProvider.html
Framework for Artificial Intelligence Diffusion - FDD, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.fdd.org/analysis/2025/05/15/framework-for-artificial-intelligence-diffusion/
DeepSeek and Other Chinese Firms Converge with Western Companies on AI Promises, accessed May 19, 2025, https://carnegieendowment.org/research/2025/01/deepseek-and-other-chinese-firms-converge-with-western-companies-on-ai-promises?lang=en
China's Zhipu AI launches free AI agent, intensifying domestic tech race, accessed May 19, 2025, https://m.economictimes.com/tech/artificial-intelligence/chinas-zhipu-ai-launches-free-ai-agent-intensifying-domestic-tech-race/articleshow/119808131.cms
Five key trends in China's generative AI market in 2025 | Roland Berger, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.rolandberger.com/en/Insights/Publications/Five-key-trends-in-China-s-generative-AI-market-in-2025.html
Open Questions for China's Open-Source AI Regulation - Just Security, accessed May 19, 2025, https://www.justsecurity.org/111053/chinas-open-source-ai-regulation/
Cross-Border Data Transfers in 2025: Regulatory Changes, AI Risks, and Operationalization, accessed May 19, 2025, https://trustarc.com/resource/webinar-cross-border-data-transfers-in-2025-regulatory-changes-ai-risks-and-operationalization/
